en: The Czech Fairtrade Association
it: Fairtrade Repubblica Ceca, Fairtrade Cechia, Fairtrade Ceca

en: Max Havelaar Denmark
da: Max Havelaar Danmark

en: TransFair Germany
de: TransFair Deutschland

en: Fairtrade Norway
nb: Fairtrade Max Havelaar Norge

en: Fairtrade Sweden
it: Fairtrade Svezia
sv: Fairtrade Sverige

en: The Fairtrade Foundation
it: Fondazione Fairtrade

en: Fairtrade Poland
pl: Poland Fundacja „Koalicja Sprawiedliwego Handlu”, Fairtrade Polska

en: Max Havelaar, Max Havelar, Fairtrade/Max Havelaar
xx: Max Havelaar
ca: Max Havelaar, Comerç Just/Max Havelaar
it: Max Havelaar

en: Max Havelaar Belgium
de: Max Havelaar Belgien
fi: Max Havelaar Belgia
fr: Max Havelaar Belgique
nl: Max Havelaar België

en: Max Havelaar France
xx: Max Havelaar France
de: Max Havelaar Frankreich
fi: Max Havelaar Ranska
nl: Max Havelaar Frankrijk

en: Small Producers' Symbol, SPP, Small Producers
xx: Small Producers' Symbol, SPP, Small Producers
es: Símbolo de Pequeños Productores, SPP, Pequeños Productores
fr: Symbole des Producteurs Paysans, SPP, Producteurs Paysans

en: Fairtrade cocoa, fairtrade cocoa program
xx: Fairtrade cocoa, fairtrade cocoa program
de: Fairtrade kokao, Fairtrade cocoa

en: Fed without GMOs, Fed without GMO, Animals fed without GMOs, Animals fed without GMO, from animals fed without GMOs, from animals fed without GMO
bg: Хранене без ГМО
ca: Alimentat sense Organismes Modificats Genèticament
fi: Eläintä on ruokittu GMO-vapaalla rehulla, ruokittu ilman GMO:ita
fr: Nourri sans OGM, nourris sans OGM, nourries sans OGM, Alimentation sans OGM, Animaux nourris sans OGM, élevage avec une alimentation sans ogm, issu d'animaux nourris sans OGM, issue d'animaux nourris sans OGM, issus d'animaux nourris sans OGM, issues d'animaux nourris sans OGM
it: Alimentati senza OGM
nl: Zonder OGM voedsel
pt: Alimentado sem OGM, alimentado sem alimentos geneticamente modificados, alimentado sem alimentos transgênicos, alimentado sem alimentos transgénicos, alimentada sem OGM, alimentada sem alimentos geneticamente modificados, alimentada sem alimentos transgênicos, alimentada sem alimentos transgénicos, alimentados sem OGM, alimentados sem alimentos geneticamente modificados, alimentados sem alimentos transgênicos, alimentados sem alimentos transgénicos, alimentadas sem OGM, alimentadas sem alimentos geneticamente modificados, alimentadas sem alimentos transgênicos, alimentadas sem alimentos transgénicos

en: Eggs from animals fed without GMOs
es: Huevos de animales alimentados sin OGM
fr: Oeufs issus d'animaux nourris sans OGMs, oeufs issus de poules nourries sans OGMs
it: Uova da animali alimentati senza OGM
nl: Eieren van dieren gevoerd zonder OGM
pt: Ovos de animais alimentados sem OGM, ovos de animais alimentados sem alimentos geneticamente modificados, ovos de animais alimentados sem transgênicos, ovos de animais alimentados sem transgénicos

en: Fed without soy
de: Ohne Soja gefüttert
es: Alimentados sin soja, alimentadas sin soja
fr: Nourri sans soja
it: Alimentato senza soia, alimentati senza soia, alimentata senza soia, alimentate senza soia
nl: Gevoerd zonder soja, gevoerd zonder soja
pt: Alimentado sem soja, alimentados sem soja, alimantada sem soja, alimantadas sem soja

en: Freedom Food, Freedom food rspca monitored
he: מזון חופש

fr: Tréfilage au bronze, tréfilé au bronze
hr: Brunirani trefilni postupak
it: Trafilata al bronzo
nl: Bronzen getrokken

en: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Pan European Forest Certification
xx: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification
de: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Zertifizierungssystem für nachhaltige Waldbewirtschaftung
es: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Programa para el Reconocimiento de Certificación Forestal
fi: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Euroopan laajuinen metsäsertifikaatti
fr: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Programme de reconnaissance des certifications forestières, PEFC France, emballage PEFC
hu: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Páneurópai Erdő Tanúsítás
pt: PEFC, Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification, Programa para o Reconhecimento de Certificação Forestal, certificado PEFC

en: 100% recyclable packaging, 100% recyclable
fr: Emballage recyclable à 100%, Recyclable à 100%

en: Green Dot, The Green Dot
xx: Green Dot, The Green Dot
bg: Зелена точка
bs: Zelena tačka
ca: Punt verd
cs: Zelený bod
de: Grüner Punkt, Grüne Punkt, Der Grüne Punkt
el: Πράσινο Σήμα
es: Punto Verde, El Punto Verde
et: Roheline Punkt
fi: vihreä piste
fr: Point Vert, Le Point Vert
he: נקודה ירוקה, הנקודה הירוקה
hr: Zelena točka
hu: Zöld Pont
it: Punto Verde, Il Punto Verde
lt: Žaliasis taškas
lv: Zaļais punkts
nb: Grønt Punkt
nl: Groene Punt
pl: Zielony Punkt
pt: Ponto Verde
ro: Punctul Verde
sk: Zelený bod
sl: Zelena pika
sr: Zelena tačka
sv: Gröna Punkten
th: กรีนดอท
tr: Yeşil Nokta